Massachusetts, session 194th, S2354.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13 of chapter 6C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end of sub-sections (c) the following:-
(iii) Financial support for traffic congestion relief and public transit initiatives and
systems as determined by the regional equity roadway board.
(d) There shall be a Regional Equity Roadway Board that will develop and deploy a
comprehensive and regionally- equitable roadway pricing policy for the Commonwealth, which
shall include, without limitation, greater Boston metropolitan area roadways, major bridges and
interstate highways near the commonwealth’s borders. The Board shall have the authority to
implement their regionally – equitable road pricing plan on behalf of the department beginning
on January 1, 2027. The Board shall consist of: the secretary of transportation or a designee; 6
of 3

members, appointed by the Governor; 1 of whom shall be an expert in transportation planning
and policy who is not an employee of the commonwealth or any political subdivision, who shall
serve as chair, 1 of whom shall be an expert in tolling systems or toll authorities, 1 of whom shall
be an expert in traffic congestion, 1 of whom shall represent a municipality that includes a
highway where roadway tolls are currently in place, 1 of whom shall be a former or current
member of the mbta board of directors, and one of whom shall be employed by an organization
that represents low-income communities that have been historically underserved by transit and
acutely adversely affected by the public health impacts of traffic congestion.
(e) The board shall: (i) identify and analyze physical, technological, legal and other
issues or requirements related to roadway pricing in the commonwealth; (ii) propose detailed
specifications and regionally-equitable locations for toll gantries and other equipment necessary
to assess and collect tolls; (iii) advise the Massachusetts Department of Transportation on
roadway pricing scenarios under the federal Value Pricing Pilot Program; (iv) provide estimates
of annual operation and maintenance costs; (v) provide estimates of annual revenue; (vi) provide
traffic forecasts including forecasts of traffic diversion impacts; (vii) provide a regional and
social equity analysis with specific recommendations related to mitigating adverse impacts; and
(viii) provide potential impacts on vehicular emissions reduction. The board shall also identify
all local, state and federal approvals necessary to deploy new tolls and other roadway pricing
mechanisms on relevant roadways.
(f) The board shall file a written report of its findings and recommendations annually
before December 15 each year, including legislative recommendations, with the clerks of the
senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on transportation. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of
of 3

mitigation measures to address social equity issues including, but not limited to, social equity
issues for communities underserved by the current transportation system and most directly
impacted by congestion.
of 3